apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="sérst/akur__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>akur</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ök</l>        <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akir</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akar</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ök</l>        <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akan</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akt</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akar</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ök</l>        <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökum</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akri</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökum</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökum</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökum</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aks</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akrar</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aks</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akra</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akra</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akra</l>      <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aki</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öku</l>       <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastur</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökust</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akast</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastir</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastar</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökust</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastan</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akasta</l>    <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akast</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akasta</l>    <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastar</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökust</l>     <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökustum</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>akastri</l>   <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ökustu</l>    <r>akur<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="sérstakur">       <i>sérst</i><par n="sérst/akur__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="einstakur">       <i>einst</i><par n="sérst/akur__adj"/></e>
